si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 563 Y 1
SFX 563 0 වයක් .
SFX 1676 Y 1
SFX 1676 0 වයකි .
SFX 4313 Y 1
SFX 4313 0 වයකු .
SFX 2378 Y 1
SFX 2378 0 වර් .
SFX 231 Y 1
SFX 231 0 වරු .
SFX 1970 Y 1
SFX 1970 0 වරේ .
SFX 2737 Y 1
SFX 2737 0 ුවීමෙන් .
SFX 2053 Y 1
SFX 2053 0 නුවන්ගේ .
SFX 4345 Y 1
SFX 4345 0 වගෙ .
SFX 645 Y 1
SFX 645 0 ගොස් .
SFX 844 Y 1
SFX 844 0 වගේ .
SFX 2353 Y 1
SFX 2353 0 වෙත .
SFX 36 Y 1
SFX 36 0 ෙහි .
SFX 194 Y 1
SFX 194 0 වෙන .
SFX 4207 Y 1
SFX 4207 0 වෙම .
SFX 892 Y 1
SFX 892 0 වෙල .
SFX 908 Y 1
SFX 908 0 යුතු .
SFX 1595 Y 1
SFX 1595 0 ුවෙමි .
SFX 1357 Y 1
SFX 1357 0 ජන .
SFX 1594 Y 1
SFX 1594 0 ුවෙමු .
SFX 4928 Y 1
SFX 4928 0 ජය .
SFX 406 Y 1
SFX 406 0 පුර .
SFX 4544 Y 1
SFX 4544 0 මුදලි .
SFX 1770 Y 1
SFX 1770 0 ජ් .
SFX 2597 Y 1
SFX 2597 0 ජා .
SFX 3381 Y 1
SFX 3381 0 ජි .
SFX 3800 Y 1
SFX 3800 0 ියෙන්ම .
SFX 230 Y 1
SFX 230 0 වෙයි .
SFX 923 Y 1
SFX 923 0 ගෙන්ද .
SFX 1537 Y 1
SFX 1537 0 ගෙන්ම .
SFX 98 Y 1
SFX 98 0 වක .
SFX 45 Y 1
SFX 45 0 වට .
SFX 1175 Y 1
SFX 1175 0 වත .
SFX 145 Y 1
SFX 145 0 වද .
SFX 54 Y 1
SFX 54 0 වන .
SFX 204 Y 1
SFX 204 0 වම .
SFX 184 Y 1
SFX 184 0 වය .
SFX 1114 Y 1
SFX 1114 0 කුමාර .
SFX 426 Y 1
SFX 426 0 වර .
SFX 26 Y 1
SFX 26 0 වල .
SFX 3368 Y 1
SFX 3368 0 ණියක .
SFX 2096 Y 1
SFX 2096 0 ණියට .
SFX 1946 Y 1
SFX 1946 0 ව් .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 වා .
SFX 1961 Y 1
SFX 1961 0 වැ .
SFX 414 Y 1
SFX 414 0 වි .
SFX 82 Y 1
SFX 82 0 වී .
SFX 464 Y 1
SFX 464 0 වු .
SFX 76 Y 1
SFX 76 0 වූ .
SFX 344 Y 1
SFX 344 0 වෙ .
SFX 2556 Y 1
SFX 2556 0 දයක් .
SFX 38 Y 1
SFX 38 0 වේ .
SFX 2487 Y 1
SFX 2487 0 පුරට .
SFX 1658 Y 1
SFX 1658 0 වො .
SFX 213 Y 1
SFX 213 0 වෝ .
SFX 1494 Y 1
SFX 1494 0 පුරය .
SFX 1558 Y 1
SFX 1558 0 කගෙන් .
SFX 4495 Y 1
SFX 4495 0 ‍යයන්ට .
SFX 1041 Y 1
SFX 1041 0 ිමත් .
SFX 4885 Y 1
SFX 4885 0 ණියේ .
SFX 4628 Y 1
SFX 4628 0 පුර් .
SFX 4629 Y 1
SFX 4629 0 පුරේ .
SFX 3658 Y 1
SFX 3658 0 ුවීමත් .
SFX 451 Y 1
SFX 451 0 වත්ත .
SFX 4336 Y 1
SFX 4336 0 වත්ද .
SFX 980 Y 1
SFX 980 0 වත්ම .
SFX 1173 Y 1
SFX 1173 0 වත්ව .
SFX 4098 Y 1
SFX 4098 0 හරණය .
SFX 4906 Y 1
SFX 4906 0 ටුවකට .
SFX 828 Y 1
SFX 828 0 ියන්ට .
SFX 2593 Y 1
SFX 2593 0 ටුවක් .
SFX 4976 Y 1
SFX 4976 0 ගත්තවුන් .
SFX 1501 Y 1
SFX 1501 0 න්නත් .
SFX 3318 Y 1
SFX 3318 0 දෙයි .
SFX 4817 Y 1
SFX 4817 0 ත්වීමට .
SFX 4464 Y 1
SFX 4464 0 යේදියි .
SFX 1282 Y 1
SFX 1282 0 ානුකූලව .
SFX 1359 Y 1
SFX 1359 0 ගේද .
SFX 2987 Y 1
SFX 2987 0 සැල් .
SFX 492 Y 1
SFX 492 0 ගේම .
SFX 1984 Y 1
SFX 1984 0 ල්ට .
SFX 3387 Y 1
SFX 3387 0 ගේය .
SFX 4361 Y 1
SFX 4361 0 ල්ය .
SFX 698 Y 1
SFX 698 0 ල්ල .
SFX 755 Y 1
SFX 755 0 ගේ් .
SFX 2343 Y 1
SFX 2343 0 සලක් .
SFX 2631 Y 1
SFX 2631 0 කාරයින් .
SFX 3875 Y 1
SFX 3875 0 ිගෙන .
SFX 2882 Y 1
SFX 2882 0 ැකිය .
SFX 4811 Y 1
SFX 4811 0 දමන .
SFX 4815 Y 1
SFX 4815 0 දත්ත .
SFX 2172 Y 1
SFX 2172 0 ්කිරීමට .
SFX 182 Y 1
SFX 182 0 ොත් .
SFX 1203 Y 1
SFX 1203 0 දම් .
SFX 2866 Y 1
SFX 2866 0 ැසෙන .
SFX 1516 Y 1
SFX 1516 0 දමා .
SFX 3340 Y 1
SFX 3340 0 දමේ .
SFX 2404 Y 1
SFX 2404 0 ලුවක් .
SFX 1445 Y 1
SFX 1445 0 ශයෙන් .
SFX 4490 Y 1
SFX 4490 0 යස් .
SFX 942 Y 1
SFX 942 0 ුවන්ට .
SFX 390 Y 1
SFX 390 0 නුත් .
SFX 1706 Y 1
SFX 1706 0 යාගේත් .
SFX 3095 Y 1
SFX 3095 0 වගාව .
SFX 3038 Y 1
SFX 3038 0 වැසි .
SFX 1216 Y 1
SFX 1216 0 කවත් .
SFX 1744 Y 1
SFX 1744 0 ධූරය .
SFX 3916 Y 1
SFX 3916 0 ැවිණ .
SFX 3914 Y 1
SFX 3914 0 ැවිය .
SFX 393 Y 1
SFX 393 0 ්වන .
SFX 1112 Y 1
SFX 1112 0 ගැන්ම .
SFX 1127 Y 1
SFX 1127 0 ්වය .
SFX 101 Y 1
SFX 101 0 ්වල .
SFX 706 Y 1
SFX 706 0 න්ටද .
SFX 4706 Y 1
SFX 4706 0 න්ටම .
SFX 871 Y 1
SFX 871 0 ්වා .
SFX 550 Y 1
SFX 550 0 ්වී .
SFX 1791 Y 1
SFX 1791 0 ්වු .
SFX 445 Y 1
SFX 445 0 ්වූ .
SFX 715 Y 1
SFX 715 0 ්වේ .
SFX 2856 Y 1
SFX 2856 0 ිකරගෙන .
SFX 4705 Y 1
SFX 4705 0 න්ට් .
SFX 3242 Y 1
SFX 3242 0 පාලක .
SFX 4637 Y 1
SFX 4637 0 පාලට .
SFX 2490 Y 1
SFX 2490 0 පාලන .
SFX 692 Y 1
SFX 692 0 ාගත් .
SFX 3563 Y 1
SFX 3563 0 ෝල් .
SFX 4151 Y 1
SFX 4151 0 සියෙන් .
SFX 4634 Y 1
SFX 4634 0 පාලි .
SFX 1137 Y 1
SFX 1137 0 ුවීම .
SFX 3632 Y 1
SFX 3632 0 ෙක්දැයි .
SFX 1314 Y 1
SFX 1314 0 රීම .
SFX 4037 Y 1
SFX 4037 0 ාණන් .
SFX 806 Y 1
SFX 806 0 කාරයන් .
SFX 1899 Y 1
SFX 1899 0 ිනට .
SFX 3844 Y 1
SFX 3844 0 ිනය .
SFX 2762 Y 1
SFX 2762 0 ුනහොත් .
SFX 4308 Y 1
SFX 4308 0 වරණයේදී .
SFX 1270 Y 1
SFX 1270 0 ිනුයි .
SFX 3435 Y 1
SFX 3435 0 කාටත් .
SFX 3842 Y 1
SFX 3842 0 ිනව .
SFX 18 Y 1
SFX 18 0 ින් .
SFX 2255 Y 1
SFX 2255 0 ිනා .
SFX 4646 Y 1
SFX 4646 0 පහන් .
SFX 148 Y 1
SFX 148 0 ිනි .
SFX 2253 Y 1
SFX 2253 0 ිනී .
SFX 885 Y 1
SFX 885 0 ිනු .
SFX 3039 Y 1
SFX 3039 0 වැන්නා .
SFX 3895 Y 1
SFX 3895 0 ිකත්වයෙන් .
SFX 2685 Y 1
SFX 2685 0 ්ඩන් .
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 වකින් .
SFX 1469 Y 1
SFX 1469 0 වකිනි .
SFX 1122 Y 1
SFX 1122 0 කම්වලට .
SFX 1062 Y 1
SFX 1062 0 වාගෙන .
SFX 2565 Y 1
SFX 2565 0 තුමාගෙන් .
SFX 4282 Y 1
SFX 4282 0 වහම .
SFX 3960 Y 1
SFX 3960 0 ාවලියක .
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 හොත් .
SFX 2890 Y 1
SFX 2890 0 ාවලියට .
SFX 4886 Y 1
SFX 4886 0 ණියන්ට .
SFX 2676 Y 1
SFX 2676 0 ්නකුට .
SFX 3308 Y 1
SFX 3308 0 නකට .
SFX 3912 Y 1
SFX 3912 0 ැවූයේ .
SFX 2175 Y 1
SFX 2175 0 ්ක .
SFX 1813 Y 1
SFX 1813 0 ්ග .
SFX 1907 Y 1
SFX 1907 0 ාවලියේ .
SFX 263 Y 1
SFX 263 0 ්ට .
SFX 249 Y 1
SFX 249 0 ්ඩ .
SFX 2684 Y 1
SFX 2684 0 ්ණ .
SFX 418 Y 1
SFX 418 0 ්ත .
SFX 3536 Y 1
SFX 3536 0 ්ථ .
SFX 92 Y 1
SFX 92 0 ්ද .
SFX 53 Y 1
SFX 53 0 ්න .
SFX 2668 Y 1
SFX 2668 0 ්ප .
SFX 139 Y 1
SFX 139 0 ්ම .
SFX 248 Y 1
SFX 248 0 ්ය .
SFX 675 Y 1
SFX 675 0 ්ල .
SFX 491 Y 1
SFX 491 0 නක් .
SFX 1002 Y 1
SFX 1002 0 නකි .
SFX 4748 Y 1
SFX 4748 0 නකු .
SFX 242 Y 1
SFX 242 0 ්ව .
SFX 1562 Y 1
SFX 1562 0 ්ස .
SFX 1014 Y 1
SFX 1014 0 ්හ .
SFX 1559 Y 1
SFX 1559 0 ්් .
SFX 3264 Y 1
SFX 3264 0 න්නෙමි .
SFX 2505 Y 1
SFX 2505 0 න්නෙමු .
SFX 2256 Y 1
SFX 2256 0 ිනම් .
SFX 2958 Y 1
SFX 2958 0 හිටි .
SFX 3386 Y 1
SFX 3386 0 ගොල්ල .
SFX 4644 Y 1
SFX 4644 0 පාක්ෂික .
SFX 2397 Y 1
SFX 2397 0 වතුර .
SFX 3477 Y 1
SFX 3477 0 ්වින් .
SFX 1210 Y 1
SFX 1210 0 ඥයන් .
SFX 780 Y 1
SFX 780 0 ාගාරය .
SFX 2571 Y 1
SFX 2571 0 තලයට .
SFX 4753 Y 1
SFX 4753 0 ධාරීන්ගේ .
SFX 116 Y 1
SFX 116 0 ැයි .
SFX 1105 Y 1
SFX 1105 0 තිස්ස .
SFX 4932 Y 1
SFX 4932 0 චිත .
SFX 3092 Y 1
SFX 3092 0 වතුන්ට .
SFX 4920 Y 1
SFX 4920 0 ඥයාට .
SFX 4859 Y 1
SFX 4859 0 තලයේ .
SFX 3163 Y 1
SFX 3163 0 යෝත් .
SFX 958 Y 1
SFX 958 0 ාරක්ෂක .
SFX 1685 Y 1
SFX 1685 0 ලුව .
SFX 4334 Y 1
SFX 4334 0 වද්දී .
SFX 2901 Y 1
SFX 2901 0 ාර්ථයක් .
SFX 2932 Y 1
SFX 2932 0 ාදියෙන් .
SFX 3380 Y 1
SFX 3380 0 ඤ්ඤ .
SFX 4514 Y 1
SFX 4514 0 යදී .
SFX 1781 Y 1
SFX 1781 0 කින්ද .
SFX 926 Y 1
SFX 926 0 කින්ම .
SFX 2068 Y 1
SFX 2068 0 දෙණිය .
SFX 4517 Y 1
SFX 4517 0 යතනය .
SFX 2366 Y 1
SFX 2366 0 වැදී .
SFX 4762 Y 1
SFX 4762 0 ද්වීපයට .
SFX 3181 Y 1
SFX 3181 0 යන්හිදී .
SFX 1291 Y 1
SFX 1291 0 සත් .
SFX 4761 Y 1
SFX 4761 0 ද්වීපයේ .
SFX 3174 Y 1
SFX 3174 0 යවීම .
SFX 4616 Y 1
SFX 4616 0 ඵලයක් .
SFX 341 Y 1
SFX 341 0 ීමටත් .
SFX 2031 Y 1
SFX 2031 0 බවට .
SFX 1215 Y 1
SFX 1215 0 කාරක .
SFX 3784 Y 1
SFX 3784 0 ිල්ලකින් .
SFX 1214 Y 1
SFX 1214 0 කාරය .
SFX 1168 Y 1
SFX 1168 0 වානම් .
SFX 155 Y 1
SFX 155 0 න්නට .
SFX 3430 Y 1
SFX 3430 0 කාරව .
SFX 511 Y 1
SFX 511 0 කාරි .
SFX 269 Y 1
SFX 269 0 කාරී .
SFX 3126 Y 1
SFX 3126 0 ලනවා .
SFX 853 Y 1
SFX 853 0 න්නා .
SFX 2507 Y 1
SFX 2507 0 න්නී .
SFX 666 Y 1
SFX 666 0 න්නෙ .
SFX 109 Y 1
SFX 109 0 න්නේ .
SFX 2043 Y 1
SFX 2043 0 න්නෝ .
SFX 3466 Y 1
SFX 3466 0 ්සිය .
SFX 2821 Y 1
SFX 2821 0 ින්නීය .
SFX 884 Y 1
SFX 884 0 ියම් .
SFX 4670 Y 1
SFX 4670 0 පතියන් .
SFX 3537 Y 1
SFX 3537 0 ්තුවේ .
SFX 2207 Y 1
SFX 2207 0 ුරක් .
SFX 3653 Y 1
SFX 3653 0 ුවෝය .
SFX 4407 Y 1
SFX 4407 0 රෝග .
SFX 4340 Y 1
SFX 4340 0 වතාවක් .
SFX 2839 Y 1
SFX 2839 0 ිණිය .
SFX 3130 Y 1
SFX 3130 0 රෝද .
SFX 4094 Y 1
SFX 4094 0 හලක .
SFX 2319 Y 1
SFX 2319 0 හලට .
SFX 314 Y 1
SFX 314 0 ්වත් .
SFX 1697 Y 1
SFX 1697 0 රාජ් .
SFX 2429 Y 1
SFX 2429 0 රාජා .
SFX 3487 Y 1
SFX 3487 0 ්වති .
SFX 1066 Y 1
SFX 1066 0 වරයකුට .
SFX 2173 Y 1
SFX 2173 0 ්කරුවන්ගේ .
SFX 889 Y 1
SFX 889 0 හල් .
SFX 4092 Y 1
SFX 4092 0 හලු .
SFX 1930 Y 1
SFX 1930 0 හලේ .
SFX 2778 Y 1
SFX 2778 0 ීයකරණය .
SFX 1401 Y 1
SFX 1401 0 ිරි .
SFX 2798 Y 1
SFX 2798 0 ිරු .
SFX 3879 Y 1
SFX 3879 0 ිගත .
