si_LK.dic
අන්/418,542,747,2378,2529,2534,3435,4495,4760
කැළ/3,8,16,57,169,178,221,468,528,753,848,1277,1634,2863,4526,4885
ගනි/5,9,13,115,136,211,256,283,664,670,1946,2025,4545
තමන්/1,7,10,11,12,35,77,100,134,140,492,755,2353,3390
තෝල්ක/4544
දෑල/2,8,426
දිර/16,20,37,41,52,86,176,259,281,1041,1142,3846,3877,3878,4001
දෙන්න/1,2,4,5,7,9,10,12,13,20,28,30,35,41,47,52,69,77,79,114,116,123,153,166,174,193,215,257,265,270,409,433,438,477,630,1285,1537,2600
නවතා/563
නැග/2,16,24,41,49,52,57,59,62,80,83,107,111,113,120,122,139,160,195,209,212,229,238,243,271,277,280,315,317,327,341,374,378,422,449,460,556,596,656,753,883,943,996,1133,1594,1801,1813,1833,2096,2185,2190,2583,2688,2731,2767,2797,3740,4675
නැන්දම්මා/1,10,12,35,923
පති/27,359,791,904,1175,4458
පැකට්/4906
පැද/16,52,59,61,63,76,80,83,86,144,176,186,209,222,223,243,281,319,464,775,821,1034,1601,1807,2207,2263,2617,3677,3678,3683,3783,3800
පැහැදිලි/3,10,13,38,54,167,204,980,2795
පිර/2,16,20,41,59,63,76,80,83,86,111,120,122,130,144,146,160,192,209,212,229,243,271,277,280,289,315,327,367,374,377,378,429,460,464,476,496,533,583,598,625,776,884,972,1145,1151,1594,1614,1617,1633,1663,1829,1860,2213,2221,2775,3285,3868
පිරි/21,58,426,606,752,800,899,1107,1433,1928,1970,3066,4075,4560,4570,4571
පිළි/23,57,61,66,94,113,232,268,300,332,333,452,493,522,524,545,546,614,703,712,789,865,892,902,996,1009,1098,1330,1361,1364,1365,1541,1544,2081,2113,2114,2121,2122,2131,2419,2482,2605,2611,2612,2994,3401,3402,3425,3426,3452,3601,4412,4502,4836,4952,4954,4971,4973,4974,4978
පුර/3,7,9,10,14,15,19,20,23,33,37,54,109,128,136,167,198,242,250,251,259,266,426,437,487,506,631,794,1062,1196,1331,1609,2042,2043,2220,2384,2487,2507,2684,2774,2892,3037,3038,3069,3255,3256,4036,4038,4090,4247,4248,4249,4250,4268,4277,4648,4688
පෙර/1,3,5,7,11,13,20,22,30,41,59,62,107,136,221,231,265,277,278,285,325,402,438,441,710,737,836,862,1003,1102,1110,1201,1213,1431,1474,1685,1931,2471,2472,2697,2871,2947,3062,3125,3495,3582,3583,3597,3733,3904,4064,4065,4070,4164,4792
පොළ/1,2,3,4,8,10,13,17,20,21,25,28,31,32,34,36,38,39,41,45,79,133,176,187,220,344,392,581,604,1581,3574,3575
ප්‍රාන්ත/3,14,15,19,26,31,52,68,121,129,210,565,2971
බදා/61,103,113,202,278,297,300,414,1094,2026,4361,4577
බෝට්ටු/10,26,29,31,38,98,172
මදුරු/213,845,1106,1658,4345
මනි/846,1494,4628,4639
මනෝ/239,310,358,359,1180,1770,2597,3213
මන්ත්‍රි/385,1961
මාන/2,10,15,16,19,20,23,40,53,61,69,79,161,260,636,955,1054,1634,2180,2286,2674,2677,3876,4311,4313
මාලිගා/10,12,38,39,45,344,1097,1174,1555,2082,4632
මැදි/9,10,14,27,54,76,78,82,86,98,118,184,200,232,358,648,703,732,790,927,1052,1456,2422,2623,3142,3741
මිනීමරු/37,66,213
මුතු/9,31,202,299,359,1114,1718,4197,4561
මුසාෆර්/4628
මෙක්සිකෝ/38,45,183,4199
මොන/6,7,20,34,37,45,145,170,251,323,349,703,716,844,981,1037,1421,1669,2091,2168,3941,4254
යාළු/13,34,37,89,196,213,253,293,439,474,845,1658
යුරෝපා/2053
රත්න/2,3,15,20,27,69,343,420,455,588,729,837,886,894,1494,1721,2487,2913,3234,4197,4629
රැව්/39,46,3318
වගකිව/908
වනිතා/45,135,213
විද්‍යාත්මක/13,145
වියලී/645
විලේ/12,1770
වෙල/2,4,5,6,13,38,41,714,924,1577,1595
වෙලා/3,7,10,11,13,29,34,38,39,45,58,61,66,71,98,113,126,127,151,172,220,329,344,375,463,730,819,1294,1603,1679,2352,2838,4201,4207,4211
ශිල්පි/210,369,416,538,906,1763,2054,3368,4886
ශෛල/3,108,129,176,186,187,334,406,775,1621
සතු/3,10,63,85,130,146,230,254,389,429,442,485,503,1079,1179,2426,3137,3159,4408,4409,4430,4431,4446,4461
සදාකාලික/3,10,204
සමඟ/3,5,7,11,13,16,18,52,54,131,148,176,186,187,281,516
සහභාගි/54,63,76,82,86,130,144,146,198,230,292,296,464,893,900,3080
සළු/10,98
සිල්/4,10,34,37,60,534,1169,1410,1459,1723,2262,2378,4339,4343,4657
සේද/24,41,80,122,222,307,341,397,451,1174
ස්ව/161,334,882,1357,1438,2618,3597,3736,3982
හැට/2,4,6,9,16,17,19,21,25,41,52,176,186,187,263,281,372,413,996,1052,1268,1522,1558,1722,1728,2322,2813,3245,3406,3814
හිට/9,24,52,57,61,122,186,212,268,274,280,318,342,351,518,595,827,952,1037,1042,1268,1269,1404,1829,1847,1882,2239,2240,2737,2825
ළඟා/54,85,130,194,198,223,230,296,399,1551,4238
